Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2172.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 33, chapter 16, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-1801.01, to read: START_STATUTE33-1801.01. Mandatory expiration of declaration; association dissolution Notwithstanding any other law or any provision in the community documents: 1. each declaration expires and is unenforceable and each association dissolves on the later of: (a) January 1, 2127. (b) One hundred years after the date on which the original declaration was recorded.  An amendment to the original declaration or the creation of a new planned community or association from all or any portion of an existing planned community does not ESTABLISH a new one hundred year-period. 2. On expiration of the declaration and dissolution of the association, the dissolved association shall wind up and liquidate its business and affairs as otherwise provided by law. 3. After expiration of the declaration and dissolution of the association, any or all of the property owners in the terminated planned community may voluntarily REESTABLISH a planned community for the properties as otherwise PROVIDED by law. END_STATUTE